lt-LT.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4449 Y 54
SFX 4449 is is . 37
SFX 4449 is s . 146
SFX 4449 is io . 38
SFX 4449 is iam . 41
SFX 4449 is į . 42
SFX 4449 is iuo . 43
SFX 4449 is iame . 44
SFX 4449 is iuodu . 241
SFX 4449 is iedu . 282
SFX 4449 is iųdviejų . 283
SFX 4449 is iemdviem . 269
SFX 4449 is iedviem . 269
SFX 4449 is iemdviems . 284
SFX 4449 is iedviems . 284
SFX 4449 is iuodu . 285
SFX 4449 is iedu . 286
SFX 4449 is iemdviem . 287
SFX 4449 is iedviem . 287
SFX 4449 is iuodviejuose . 270
SFX 4449 is iuodviejuos . 271
SFX 4449 is ie . 39
SFX 4449 is ių . 40
SFX 4449 is iems . 45
SFX 4449 is iem . 46
SFX 4449 is iuos . 47
SFX 4449 is iais . 48
SFX 4449 is iuose . 49
SFX 4449 is i . 83
SFX 4449 is ios . 84
SFX 4449 is iai . 87
SFX 4449 is ią . 88
SFX 4449 is ia . 89
SFX 4449 is ioje . 90
SFX 4449 is ioj . 91
SFX 4449 is iedvi . 249
SFX 4449 is iodvi . 288
SFX 4449 is iuodvi . 288
SFX 4449 is iųdviejų . 289
SFX 4449 is iomdviem . 272
SFX 4449 is iodviem . 272
SFX 4449 is iomdviems . 290
SFX 4449 is iodviems . 290
SFX 4449 is iedvi . 291
SFX 4449 is iomdviem . 292
SFX 4449 is iodviem . 292
SFX 4449 is iodviejose . 281
SFX 4449 is ios . 85
SFX 4449 is ių . 86
SFX 4449 is ioms . 92
SFX 4449 is iom . 93
SFX 4449 is ias . 94
SFX 4449 is iomis . 95
SFX 4449 is iom . 224
SFX 4449 is iose . 97

SFX 4456 Y 4
SFX 4456 is ian . 52
SFX 4456 is iuosna . 53
SFX 4456 is ion . 101
SFX 4456 is iosna . 102

SFX 4507 Y 1
SFX 4507 is sai/405 . 117

SFX 4508 Y 1
SFX 4508 is sai/406 . 117

SFX 4509 Y 33
SFX 4509 ts ts . 37
SFX 4509 ts ties . 38
SFX 4509 ts čio . 293
SFX 4509 ts čiam . 41
SFX 4509 ts tį . 42
SFX 4509 ts čiu . 43
SFX 4509 ts timi . 294
SFX 4509 ts tim . 295
SFX 4509 ts čiame . 44
SFX 4509 ts čiam . 75
SFX 4509 ts tys . 39
SFX 4509 ts čių . 40
SFX 4509 ts tiems . 45
SFX 4509 ts tiem . 46
SFX 4509 ts čius . 47
SFX 4509 ts čiais . 48
SFX 4509 ts čiuose . 49
SFX 4509 ts čiuos . 50
SFX 4509 ts ti . 83
SFX 4509 ts čios . 84
SFX 4509 ts čiai . 87
SFX 4509 ts čią . 88
SFX 4509 ts čia . 89
SFX 4509 ts čioje . 90
SFX 4509 ts čioj . 91
SFX 4509 ts čios . 85
SFX 4509 ts čių . 86
SFX 4509 ts čioms . 92
SFX 4509 ts čiom . 93
SFX 4509 ts čias . 94
SFX 4509 ts čiomis . 95
SFX 4509 ts čiom . 224
SFX 4509 ts čiose . 97

SFX 4519 Y 4
SFX 4519 ts čian . 52
SFX 4519 ts čiuosna . 53
SFX 4519 ts čion . 101
SFX 4519 ts čiosna . 102

SFX 4520 Y 2
SFX 4520 ts čiu . 54
SFX 4520 ts ti . 103

SFX 4548 Y 1
SFX 4548 ts tsai/405 . 117

SFX 4549 Y 1
SFX 4549 ts tsai/406 . 117

SFX 4550 Y 1
SFX 4550 ts tsai/407 . 117

SFX 4551 Y 17
SFX 4551 a a . 56
SFX 4551 a os . 57
SFX 4551 a ai . 60
SFX 4551 a ą . 61
SFX 4551 a a . 62
SFX 4551 a oje . 63
SFX 4551 a oj . 78
SFX 4551 a a . 70
SFX 4551 a os . 58
SFX 4551 a ų . 59
SFX 4551 a oms . 64
SFX 4551 a om . 65
SFX 4551 a as . 66
SFX 4551 a omis . 67
SFX 4551 a om . 105
SFX 4551 a ose . 68
SFX 4551 a os . 71

SFX 4559 Y 2
SFX 4559 a on . 72
SFX 4559 a osna . 73

SFX 4570 Y 6
SFX 4570 as as . 137
SFX 4570 as o . 138
SFX 4570 as am . 139
SFX 4570 as ą . 140
SFX 4570 as uo . 141
SFX 4570 as ame . 142

SFX 4576 Y 1
SFX 4576 as an . 145

SFX 4577 Y 17
SFX 4577 i i . 167
SFX 4577 i ių . 168
SFX 4577 i iems . 169
SFX 4577 i iem . 195
SFX 4577 i is [^r]i 171
SFX 4577 i ius ri 171
SFX 4577 i iais . 172
SFX 4577 i iuose . 173
SFX 4577 i iuos . 174
SFX 4577 i ios . 176
SFX 4577 i ių . 177
SFX 4577 i ioms . 178
SFX 4577 i iom . 197
SFX 4577 i ias . 180
SFX 4577 i iomis . 181
SFX 4577 i iom . 198
SFX 4577 i iose . 183

SFX 4586 Y 2
SFX 4586 i iuosna . 192
SFX 4586 i iosna . 193

SFX 4596 Y 6
SFX 4596 as as . 137
SFX 4596 as o . 138
SFX 4596 as ui . 139
SFX 4596 as ą . 140
SFX 4596 as u . 141
SFX 4596 as e . 142

SFX 4602 Y 1
SFX 4602 as an . 145

SFX 4603 Y 7
SFX 4603 a a . 137
SFX 4603 a os . 138
SFX 4603 a ai . 139
SFX 4603 a a . 140
SFX 4603 a a . 141
SFX 4603 a oje . 142
SFX 4603 a oj . 143

SFX 4610 Y 1
SFX 4610 a on . 145

SFX 4611 Y 12
SFX 4611 dešimt dešimt . 273
SFX 4611 dešimt dešimt . 296
SFX 4611 dešimt dešimt . 297
SFX 4611 dešimt dešimt . 298
SFX 4611 dešimt dešimt . 299
SFX 4611 dešimt dešimt . 275
SFX 4611 dešimt dešimtis . 137
SFX 4611 dešimt dešimties . 138
SFX 4611 dešimt dešimčiai . 139
SFX 4611 dešimt dešimtį . 140
SFX 4611 dešimt dešimčia . 141
SFX 4611 dešimt dešimtyje . 142

SFX 4623 Y 1
SFX 4623 dešimt dešimtin . 145

SFX 4624 Y 32
SFX 4624 iškis iškis . 37
SFX 4624 iškis iškio . 38
SFX 4624 iškis iškiam . 41
SFX 4624 iškis iškį . 42
SFX 4624 iškis iškiu . 43
SFX 4624 iškis iškiame . 44
SFX 4624 iškis iškiam . 75
SFX 4624 iškis iškiai . 39
SFX 4624 iškis iškių . 40
SFX 4624 iškis iškiams . 45
SFX 4624 iškis iškiam . 46
SFX 4624 iškis iškiems . 45
SFX 4624 iškis iškiem . 46
SFX 4624 iškis iškius . 47
SFX 4624 iškis iškiais . 48
SFX 4624 iškis iškiuose . 49
SFX 4624 iškis iškiuos . 50
SFX 4624 iškis iškė . 83
SFX 4624 iškis iškės . 84
SFX 4624 iškis iškei . 87
SFX 4624 iškis iškę . 88
SFX 4624 iškis iške . 89
SFX 4624 iškis iškėje . 90
SFX 4624 iškis iškėj . 91
SFX 4624 iškis iškės . 85
SFX 4624 iškis iškių . 86
SFX 4624 iškis iškėms . 92
SFX 4624 iškis iškėm . 93
SFX 4624 iškis iškes . 94
SFX 4624 iškis iškėmis . 95
SFX 4624 iškis iškėm . 96
SFX 4624 iškis iškėse . 97

SFX 4631 Y 4
SFX 4631 iškis iškian . 52
SFX 4631 iškis iškiuosna . 53
SFX 4631 iškis iškėn . 101
SFX 4631 iškis iškėsna . 102

SFX 4632 Y 2
SFX 4632 iškis iškiu . 54
SFX 4632 iškis iški . 103

AF 4624,4631,9999 # 293
AF 4449,4456,4507,4508,9999 # 296
AF 4577,4586,9999 # 297
AF 4596,4602,9999 # 298
AF 4611,4623,9999 # 299
AF 4603,4610,9999 # 301
AF 4570,4576,9999 # 303
AF 4509,4519,4548,4549,9999 # 362
AF 4551,4559,9999 # 378
