lt-LT.dic
jūsiškis/293	21
kažkuris/296	21
keleri/297	21
keletas/298	21
keli/297	21
keliasdešimt/299	21
keliolika/301	21
kieka/301	21
kitkas/303	21
kuris/296	21
maniškis/293	21
mūsiškis/293	21
pats/362	21
saviškis/293	21
tamsta/378	21
taviškis/293	21
viskas/303	21
